de: Tonart: A-Dur; a-Moll; A#; As-Dur; as-Moll; H-Dur; b-Moll; B-Dur; b-Moll; C-Dur; c-Moll; C#; D-Dur; d-Moll; D#; Des-Dur; des-Moll; E-Dur; e-Moll; Es-Dur; es-Moll; F-Dur; f-Moll; Fis; G-Dur; g-Moll; G#; Ges-Dur; ges-Moll; Sonstiges
el: Μουσικό κλειδί: A ματζόρε; Α μινόρε; A δίεση; Ab ματζόρε; Ab μινόρε; Β ματζόρε; Β μινόρε; Bb ματζόρε; Bb μινόρε; C ματζόρε; C μινόρε; C#; D ματζόρε; D μινόρε; D δίεση; Db ματζόρε; Db μινόρε; Ε ματζόρε; Ε μινόρε; Eb ματζόρε; Eb μινόρε; F ματζόρε; F μινόρε; F δίεση; G ματζόρε; G μινόρε; G δίεση; Gb ματζόρε; Gb μινόρε; Άλλο
pt-BR: Nota musical: Lá maior; Lá menor; A#; Lá bemol maior; Lá bemol menor; Si maior; Si menor; Si bemol maior; Si bemol menor; Dó maior; Dó menor; C#; Ré maior; Ré menor; D#; Ré bemol maior; Ré bemol menor; Mi maior; Mi menor; Mi bemol maior; Mi bemol menor; Fá maior; Fá menor; Fá#; Sol major; Sol menor; G#; Sol bemol maior; Sol bemol menor; Outro
th: คีย์ดนตรี: A เมเจอร์; เอไมเนอร์; A#; เอแฟลตเมเจอร์; เอแฟลตไมเนอร์; B เมเจอร์; บีไมเนอร์; บีแฟลตเมเจอร์; บีแฟลตไมเนอร์; C เมเจอร์; ซีไมเนอร์; C#; D เมเจอร์; ดีไมเนอร์; D#; ดีแฟลตเมเจอร์; ดีแฟลตไมเนอร์; E เมเจอร์; อีไมเนอร์; อีแฟลตเมเจอร์; อีแฟลตไมเนอร์; F เมเจอร์; เอฟไมเนอร์; F#; G เมเจอร์; จีไมเนอร์; G#; จีแฟลตเมเจอร์; จีแฟลตไมเนอร์; อื่นๆ
en: Musical key: A major; A minor; A#; Ab major; Ab minor; B major; B minor; Bb major; Bb minor; C major; C minor; C#; D major; D minor; D#; Db major; Db minor; E major; E minor; Eb major; Eb minor; F major; F minor; F#; G major; G minor; G#; Gb major; Gb minor; Other
da: Musikalsk nøgle: A-dur; A-mol; A#; Ab-dur; Ab-mol; B-dur; B-mol; Bb-dur; Bb-mol; C-dur; C-mol; C#; D-dur; D-mol; D#; Db-dur; Db-mol; E-dur; E-mol; Eb-dur; Eb-mol; F-dur; F-mol; F#; G-dur; G-mol; G#; Gb-dur; Gb-mol; Andet
fr: Clé musicale: La majeur; La mineur; Do dièse; Si majeur; Fa mineur; Si majeur; Si mineur; Si bémol majeur; Si bémol mineur; Do majeur; Do mineur; Mi dièse; Ré majeur; Ré mineur; Fa dièse; Ré bémol majeur; Ré bémol mineur; Mi majeur; Mi mineur; Mi majeur; Mi bémol mineur; Fa majeur; La mineur; F#; Fa# majeur; Sol mineur; Si dièse; Sol bémol majeur; Sol bémol mineur; Autre
fi: Sävellaji: A major; A-molli; Ais; As-duuri; As-molli; B major; H-molli; B-duuri; B-molli; C major; C-molli; Cis; D major; D-molli; Dis; Des-duuri; Des-molli; E major; E-molli; Es-duuri; Es-molli; F major; F-molli; F#; G major; G-molli; Gis; Ges-duuri; Ges-molli; Muu
hr-HR: Glazbeni ključ: A-dur; A-mol; A#; Ab-dur; Ab-mol; B-dur; B-mol; Bb-dur; Bb-mol; C-dur; C-mol; C#; D-dur; D-mol; D#; Db-dur; Db-mol; E-dur; E-mol; Eb-dur; Eb-mol; F-dur; F-mol; F#; G-dur; G-mol; G#; Gb-dur; Gb-mol; Ostalo
tr: Müzik anahtarı: La majör; A minör; A#; Ab majör; Ab minör; B majör; B minör; Bb majör; Bb minör; Do majör; C minör; C#; Re majör; D minör; D#; Db majör; Db minör; Mi majör; E minör; Eb majör; Eb minör; Fa majör; F minör; F#; Sol majör; G minör; G#; Gb majör; Gb minör; Diğer
lt-LT: Muzikinė tonacija: A mažoras; A minoras; A#; Ab mažoras; Ab minoras; B mažoras; B minoras; Bb mažoras; Bb minoras; C mažoras; C minoras; C#; D mažoras; D minoras; D#; Db mažoras; Db minoras; E mažoras; E minoras; Eb mažoras; Eb minoras; F mažoras; F minoras; F#; G mažoras; G minoras; G#; Gb mažoras; Gb minoras; Kita
vi: Phím nhạc: A major; A thứ; A#; Ab trưởng; Ab thứ; B major; B thứ; Bb trưởng; Bb thứ; C major; C thứ; C#; D major; D thứ; D#; Db trưởng; Db thứ; E major; E thứ; Eb trưởng; Eb thứ; F major; F thứ; F#; G major; G nhỏ; G#; Gb trưởng; Gb thứ; Khác
zh-TW: 音調: A 大調; A 小調; 升 A 調; 降 A 大調; 降 A 小調; B 大調; B 小調; 降 B 大調; 降 B 小調; C 大調; C 小調; 升 C 調; D 大調; D 小調; 升 D 調; 降 D 大調; 降 D 小調; E 大調; E 小調; 降 E 大調; 降 E 小調; F 大調; F 小調; F#; G 大調; G 小調; 升 G 調; 降 G 大調; 降 G 小調; 其他
zh-CN: 琴键: A 大调; A 小调; A 升号; 降 A 大调; 降 A 小调; B 大调; B 小调; 降 B 大调; 降 B 小调; C 大调; C 小调; C 升号; D 大调; D 小调; D 升号; 降 D 大调; 降 D 小调; E 大调; E 小调; 降 E 大调; 降 E 小调; F 大调; F 小调; F#; G 大调; G 小调; G 升号; 降 G 大调; 降 G 小调; 其他
it: Chiave musicale: La maggiore; La minore; La diesis; La bemolle maggiore; La bemolle minore; Si maggiore; Si minore; Si bemolle maggiore; Si bemolle minore; Do maggiore; Do minore; Do diesis; Re maggiore; Re minore; Re diesis; Re bemolle maggiore; Re bemolle minore; Mi maggiore; Mi minore; Mi bemolle maggiore; Mi bemolle minore; Fa maggiore; Fa minore; Fa#; Sol maggiore; Sol minore; Sol diesis; Sol bemolle maggiore; Sol bemolle minore; Altro
ro-RO: Cheia muzicală: La major; La minor; La diez; La bemol major; La bemol minor; Si major; Si minor; Si bemol major; Si bemol minor; Do major; Do minor; Do diez; Re major; Re minor; Re diez; Re bemol major; Re bemol minor; Mi major; Mi minor; Mi bemol major; Mi bemol minor; Fa major; Fa minor; Fa diez; Sol major; Sol minor; Sol diez; Sol bemol major; Sol minor minor; Altele
nl: Muzieksleutel: A majeur; A-mineur; A#; Ab-majeur; Ab-mineur; B-majeur; B-mineur; Bb-majeur; Bb-mineur; C-majeur; C-mineur; C#; D-majeur; D-mineur; D#; Db-majeur; Db-mineur; E-majeur; E-mineur; Eb-majeur; Eb-mineur; F-majeur; F-mineur; F#; G-majeur; G-mineur; G#; Gb-majeur; Gb-mineur; Andere
pl: Klucz muzyczny: A dur; A-moll; A#; As-dur; As-moll; B dur; H-moll; B-dur; B- moll; C dur; C-moll; C#; D dur; D-moll; D#; Des-dur; Des-moll; E dur; E-moll; Es-dur; Es-moll; F dur; F-moll; F#; G dur; G-moll; G#; Ges-dur; Ges-moll; Inne
ja: 音楽の調: Aメジャー; Aマイナー; A#; Abメジャー; Abマイナー; Bメジャー; Bマイナー; Bbメジャー; Bbマイナー; Cメジャー; Cマイナー; C#; Dメジャー; Dマイナー; D#; Dbメジャー; Dbマイナー; Eメジャー; Eマイナー; Ebメジャー; Ebマイナー; Fメジャー; Fマイナー; F#; Gメジャー; Gマイナー; G#; Gbメジャー; Gbマイナー; その他
bg-BG: Музикален тон: А мажор; A минор; A#; Ab мажор; Ab минор; B мажор; B минор; Bb мажор; Bb минор; C мажор; C минор; C#; D мажор; D минор; D#; Db мажор; Db минор; E мажор; E минор; Eb мажор; Eb минор; F мажор; F минор; F#; G мажор; G минор; G#; Gb мажор; Gb минор; Други
cs: Hudební tónina: A dur; A moll; A#; Ab dur; Ab moll; B dur; B moll; Bb dur; Bb moll; C dur; C moll; C#; D dur; D moll; D#; Db dur; Db moll; E dur; E moll; Eb dur; Eb moll; F dur; F moll; F#; G dur; G moll; G#; Gb dur; Gb moll; Jiné
pt-PT: Chave musical: A maior; A menor; A#; Ab maior; Ab menor; B maior; B menor; Bb maior; Bb menor; C maior; C menor; C#; D maior; D menor; D#; Db maior; Db menor; E maior; E menor; Eb maior; Eb menor; F maior; F menor; F#; G maior; G menor; G#; Gb maior; Gb menor; Outro
sl-SI: Glasbeni ključ: A-dur; A-mol; A#; Ab-dur; Ab-mol; B-dur; B-mol; Bb-dur; Bb-mol; C-dur; C-mol; C#; D-dur; D-mol; D#; Db-dur; Db-mol; E-dur; E-mol; EB-dur; Eb-mol; F-dur; F-mol; F#; G-dur; G-mol; G#; Gb-dur; Gb-mol; Drugo
ru: Музыкальная тональность: Ля мажор; Ля минор; A#; Ab мажор; Ab минор; Си мажор; Си минор; Bb мажор; Bb минор; До мажор; До минор; C#; Ре мажор; Ре минор; D#; Db минор; Db минор; Ми мажор; Ми минор; Eb мажор; Eb минор; Фа мажор; Фа минор; F#; Соль мажор; Соль минор; G#; Gb мажор; Gb минор; Другая
sk-SK: Hudobný kľúč: A dur; A mol; A#; Ab dur; Ab mol; B dur; B mol; Bb dur; Bb moll; C dur; C mol; C#; D dur; D mol; D#; Db dur; Db mol; E dur; E mol; Eb dur; Eb mol; F dur; F mol; F#; G dur; G mol; G#; Gb dur; Gb mol; Iné
hu: Hangnem: A-dúr; A-moll; A#; Ab-dúr; Ab-moll; B-dúr; B-moll; Bb-dúr; Bb-moll; C-dúr; C-moll; C#; D-dúr; D-moll; D#; Db-dúr; Db-moll; E-dúr; E-moll; Eb-dúr; Eb-moll; F-dúr; F-moll; F#; G-dúr; G-moll; G#; Gb-dúr; Gb-moll; Egyéb
es: Clave musical: A major; La menor; La#; Lab mayor; Lab menor; B mayor; Si menor; Sib mayor; Sib menor; C mayor; Do menor; Do#; D mayor; Re menor; Re#; Reb mayor; Reb menor; E mayor; Mi menor; Mib mayor; Mib menor; F mayor; Fa menor; F#; G mayor; Sol menor; Sol#; Solb mayor; Solb menor; Otros
nb: Musikalsk toneart: A-dur; A-moll; A#; Ab-dur; Ab-moll; A#-dur; B-moll; Bb-dur; Bb-moll; C-dur; C-moll; C#; D-dur; D-moll; D#; Db-dur; Db-moll; E-dur; E-moll; Eb-dur; Eb-moll; F-dur; F-moll; F#; G-dur; G-moll; G#; Gb-dur; Gb-moll; Annet
sv: Tonart: A-dur; A-moll; A#; Ab-dur; Ab-moll; B-dur; B-moll; Bb-dur; Bb-moll; C-dur; C-moll; C#; D-dur; D-moll; D#; Db-dur; Db-moll; E-dur; E-moll; Eb-dur; Eb-moll; F-dur; F-moll; F#; G-dur; G-moll; G#; Gb-dur; Gb-moll; Övrigt
ko: 조성: A장조; A단조; A#; Ab장조; Ab단조; B장조; B단조; Bb장조; Bb단조; C장조; C단조; C#; D장조; D단조; D#; Db장조; Db단조; E장조; E단조; Eb장조; Eb단조; F장조; F단조; F#; G장조; G단조; G#; Gb장조; Gb단조; 기타